Utah statutes.
4-12-8.   Unlawful acts specified.

No person in this state shall:

(1)  manufacture or distribute adulterated or misbranded commercial feed;

(2)  adulterate or misbrand any commercial feed;

(3)  distribute agricultural products such as whole seed, hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, or bulbs which are adulterated;

(4)  remove or dispose of any commercial feed in violation of a "stop sale, use, or removal order;" or

(5)  distribute any commercial feed which is not registered or any customer-formula feed which is not subject to permit.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

